Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
PART 5
MOTOR CARRIERS OF HOUSEHOLD GOODS

40-10.1-501. Definitions.

As used in this part 5, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Accessorial service" means any service performed by a mover that results in a charge to the shipper and is incidental to the transportation service, including valuation coverage; preparation of written inventory; equipment, including dollies, hand trucks, pads, blankets, and straps; storage, packing, unpacking, or crating of articles; hoisting or lowering; waiting time; long carry, which is defined as carrying articles excessive distances between the mover's vehicle and the residence; overtime loading and unloading; reweighing; disassembly or reassembly; elevator or stair carrying; boxing or servicing of appliances; and furnishing of packing or crating materials. "Accessorial service" also includes services not performed by the mover but by a third party at the request of the shipper or mover if the charges for such services are to be paid to the mover by the shipper at or prior to the time of delivery.

"Contract" means a written document, approved by the shipper in writing before the performance of any service, that authorizes services from the named mover and lists the services and all costs associated with the transportation of household goods and accessorial services to be performed.

"Estimate" means a written document that sets forth the total cost and the basis of such costs related to a shipper's move, including transportation or accessorial services.

"Storage" means warehousing of the shipper's goods while under the care, custody, and control of the mover.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 412, § 1, effective August 10.

40-10.1-502. Permit requirements - issuance by ports of entry.

A person shall not operate or offer to operate as a mover in intrastate commerce pursuant to this article, or advertise services as a mover, without first having obtained a permit from the commission in accordance with this part 5.

A mover shall annually apply for a permit under this part 5 to the commission in such form and with such information as the commission may require.

The commission may deny an application under this part 5 or refuse to renew the permit of any mover based upon a determination that the mover, or any of its directors, officers, owners, or general partners has not satisfied a civil penalty arising out of any administrative or enforcement action brought by the commission.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section and section 40-10.1-112 (4), the commission shall issue a permit to a mover upon completion of the application and compliance with the financial responsibility requirements of this article.

A permit is not valid for a mover transacting business at any location other than those designated in its application unless the mover first notifies the commission in writing of any change of location. A permit issued under this section is not assignable, and the mover is not permitted to conduct business under more than one name except as shown on its permit. A mover desiring to change its name or location at a time other than upon renewal of a permit shall notify the commission of such change.

The Colorado state patrol may issue, through a port of entry weigh station created pursuant to article 8 of title 42, C.R.S., a temporary household goods mover permit. The temporary permit is valid for fifteen consecutive days and is not renewable. A mover or its successor who has been issued a temporary permit is not eligible for a subsequent temporary permit.

A temporary permit shall not be approved until the applicant:

Provides evidence of financial responsibility as required by section 40-10.1-107;

Signs a verification, under penalty of perjury as specified in section 24-4-104 (13)(a), C.R.S., that the applicant meets the financial responsibility required by section 40-10.1-107; and

Pays the fees required by section 40-10.1-111 (1)(e) and (1)(f). The Colorado state patrol shall transmit the fees to the state treasurer, who shall credit them to the public utilities commission motor carrier fund pursuant to section 40-10.1-111 (4).

If a mover applied for and received a temporary permit pursuant to this subsection (5), the mover is not subject, during the period covered by the temporary permit, to a penalty for failure to have a permanent permit.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 412, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

(5)(a) and (5)(b)(III) amended, (HB 12-1019), ch. 135, p. 466, § 8, effective July 1.

40-10.1-503. Enforcement of carrier's lien.

A mover without a current and valid permit issued under this part 5 is not entitled to acquire or enforce a carrier's lien under section 4-7-307 or 4-7-308, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 413, § 1, effective August 10.

40-10.1-504. Advertising.

No mover, nor any officer, agent, employee, or representative of the mover, shall advertise a transportation service in a name other than that in which the mover's permit is held.

Each advertisement of a mover shall include the phrase "CO PUC permit no. ___" and the physical address of the mover.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 413, § 1, effective August 10.

40-10.1-505. Contracts for service.

At or before the time of commencing work, a mover that provides any moving or accessorial services shall leave with the shipper a contract as specified by the commission containing the information listed in this subsection (1). The contract must be signed and dated by the shipper and the mover and must include:

The name, telephone number, and physical address where the mover's employees are available during normal business hours;

The date the document is prepared and the proposed date of the move;

The name and address of the shipper, the addresses where the goods are to be picked up and delivered, and a telephone number where the shipper may be reached;

The name, telephone number, and physical address of a location where the goods will be held pending further transportation, including situations where the mover retains possession of goods pending resolution of a fee dispute with the shipper;

An itemized breakdown and description of costs or rates and services for transportation and accessorial services to be provided during a move or storage of household goods;

Acceptable forms of payment. A mover shall accept a minimum of two of the following four forms of payment:

Cash;

Cashier's check, money order, or traveler's check;

A valid personal check, showing upon its face the name and address of the shipper or authorized representative; or

A valid credit card.

Any other items as designated by the rules of the commission.

A mover shall clearly and conspicuously disclose to the shipper in the contract the forms of payments the mover will accept from those categories described in paragraph (f) of subsection (1) of this section.

Each contract must include the phrase "(name of mover) is permitted with the public utilities commission of the state of Colorado as a mover. Permit no. ___."

At or before the time of commencing work, the mover shall leave with the shipper a consumer advisement. The mover shall retain a copy of the consumer advisement, signed and dated by the shipper, for at least three years and shall make the copy available to the commission upon request. The consumer advisement shall be in substantially the following form:

Intrastate movers in Colorado are regulated by the Colorado public utilities commission (PUC). Each mover should have a PUC permit number. You are encouraged to contact the PUC to confirm that the mover you are using is indeed permitted in Colorado.

A mover that is not permitted may

not

withhold any of your property to enforce payment of money due under the contract ("carrier's lien").

A mover must include its PUC permit number, true name, and physical (street) address in all advertisements.

You should be aware that the total price of any household move can change, based on a number of factors that may include at least the following:

Consumer Advisement

o Additional services you request at the time of the move;
o Additional items to be moved that were not included in the mover's original estimate;
o Changes to the location or accessibility of building entrances, at either end of the move, that were not included in the mover's original estimate; and
o Changes to the previously agreed date of pickup or delivery.
You should also be aware that, in case of a dispute between you and the mover, Colorado has an arbitration process available to resolve the dispute without going to court.
If you have any questions, you are encouraged to call the PUC for guidance on your rights and obligations.
I acknowledge that I have been given a copy of this consumer advisement to keep for my records.

Signed __________________________ (shipper).

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 414, § 1, effective August 10.

40-10.1-506. Delivery and storage of household goods.

A mover shall relinquish household goods to a shipper and shall place the goods inside a shipper's dwelling unless the shipper has not tendered payment in the amount specified in a contract signed and dated by the shipper. A mover shall not refuse to relinquish prescription medicines, medical equipment, medical devices, or goods for use by children, including children's furniture, clothing, or toys, under any circumstances.

A mover shall not refuse to relinquish household goods to a shipper or fail to place the goods inside a shipper's dwelling based on the mover's refusal to accept an acceptable form of payment.

A mover that lawfully refuses to relinquish a shipper's household goods may place the goods in storage until payment is tendered; however, the mover shall notify the shipper of the location where the goods are stored and the amount due within five days after receipt of a written request for that information from the shipper, which request shall include the address where the shipper may receive the notice. A mover shall not require a prospective shipper to waive any rights or requirements under this section.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 416, § 1, effective August 10.

40-10.1-507. Binding arbitration.

In the event of a dispute between a mover and a shipper concerning the amount charged for services or concerning lost or damaged goods, the mover shall offer the shipper the opportunity to participate in binding arbitration under the uniform rules for better business bureau binding arbitration or a substantially similar binding arbitration process promulgated by the council of better business bureaus, incorporated, or its successor organization. If the shipper accepts the offer to arbitrate, the mover shall participate in good faith in the arbitration process and shall agree to be bound by the arbitrator's award.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 416, § 1, effective August 10.

40-10.1-508. Revocation of permit for failure to pay fine.

If a mover that holds a permit under this section fails to pay a fine or civil penalty imposed under this part 5 or a rule issued under this article 10.1 within the time prescribed for payment, and not before the decision imposing the fine or civil penalty becomes a final decision by the commission, the permit is revoked immediately. Any of the following are disqualified from applying for a permit for thirty-six months after the date the fine or civil penalty is due:

The mover;

Any owner, principal, officer, member, partner, or director of the mover; and

Any other entity owned or operated by that owner, principal, officer, member, partner, or director.

This disqualification is in addition to and not in lieu of any other penalty or disqualification, including the period of disqualification specified in section 40-10.1-112 (4).

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (SB 13-189), ch. 365, p. 2127, § 5, effective June 5.

L. 2017:

IP(1) amended, (SB 17-180), ch. 281, p. 1533, § 6, effective August 9.

40-10.1-509. Outreach - fund.

The moving outreach fund is hereby created in the state treasury. The fund consists of one-half the penalties collected from movers and credited to the fund under section 40-7-112. The commission shall use the fund to educate consumers about their rights and the responsibilities of movers under this part 5. This outreach includes public service announcements about the licensing of movers. The moneys in the fund and any interest earned on moneys in the fund remain in the fund and do not revert to the general fund at the end of any fiscal year.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (SB 13-189), ch. 365, p. 2127, § 5, effective June 5.